California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(a) When a lien claimant receives payment for the total amounts secured by the lien and the lien claimant has not furnished agricultural chemicals or seeds for a period of 45 consecutive days, the lien claimant shall send the lien debtor a statement that he or she no longer claims a security interest under the notice of claim of lien, which shall be identified by the date, names of parties thereto, and file number. If the affected lienholder of record fails to send the termination statement within 10 days, he or she is liable to the debtor for all actual damages suffered by the debtor by reason of this failure, and if the failure is in bad faith, for a penalty of one hundred dollars ($100).

(b) The filing officer shall mark each termination statement with the date and time of filing and shall index the statement under the name of the lien debtor and under the file number of the original lien. If the filing officer has a microfilm or other photographic record of the lien and related filings, he or she may remove and destroy the originals from the files at any time after receipt of the termination statement. If the filing officer does not have the record, he or she may remove and destroy the originals from the files at any time after one year after receipt of the termination statement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1502, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Assignment of Lien [57590. - 57591.]

57590.

(a) A lien created pursuant to this chapter is assignable or transferable by the holder of the lien, with full rights of enforcement.

(b) The lienholder shall file a statement of assignment or transfer with the office of the Secretary of State in the same manner that a statement is filed pursuant to Section 9514 of the Commercial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 44.8.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

57591.

Except to the extent specifically set forth in this chapter, the lien created by this chapter is subject to Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) of the Commercial Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1502, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Miscellaneous [57595. - 57595.]

57595.

The Secretary of State may adopt any regulations necessary to carry out his or her duties pursuant to this chapter, including prescribing necessary forms.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1502, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 14. Limitation on Nonconsensual Supplier Liens [57700. - 57700.]

57700.

No more than two liens filed pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 57501) and Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 57551) shall be enforceable against any one lien debtor, even if filed by different lien claimants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1502, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 21. MARKETING [58001. - 63129.]



PART 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS [58001. - 58596.5.]



  CHAPTER 1. State Marketing Services [58001. - 58093.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions and General Provisions [58001. - 58005.]

58001.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58002.

“Organization of producers and distributors” includes all corporations, societies, associations, and organizations of producers, producers and distributors, or distributors, cooperative or otherwise, which are formed for the purpose of facilitating the marketing of any product.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58003.

“Product” means any agricultural, aquacultural, dairy, or farm product which is produced, grown, raised, manufactured, or processed within the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 810, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

58004.

Except as provided in Section 58005, fees, charges, and costs that are collected under this chapter shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 346, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

58005.

All fees, charges, and costs that are received under this chapter for the collection, analysis, and dissemination of market news shall be paid into the State Treasury monthly to the credit of the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund. Funds received for these purposes, upon appropriation, shall be expended by the department for market news services. The secretary may adopt regulations implementing procedures for receiving fees, charges, and reimbursement for costs from users of market news.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 346, Sec. 2.   Effective August 29, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Powers of the Director [58031. - 58042.]

58031.

The director may act as adviser for producers and distributors, if requested, and assist them in economical and efficient distribution of any product at fair prices.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58032.

The director may gather and disseminate impartial information which concerns supply, demand, prevailing prices, and commercial movements, including common and cold storage of any product.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58033.

The director may promote, assist, and encourage the organization and operation of cooperative and other associations and organizations for improving the relations and services among producers, distributors, and consumers of any product, and protect and conserve the interests of the producers and consignors of products.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58034.

The director may foster and encourage cooperation between producers and distributors of any product, in the interest of the general public.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58035.

The director may foster and encourage the standardizing, grading, inspection, labeling, handling, storage, and sale of any product.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58036.

The director may act as a mediator or arbitrator, if invited by both parties, in any controversy or issue that may arise between producers and distributors of any product.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58037.

The director may certify, for the protection of owners, buyers, or creditors, if so requested, warehouse receipts for any product, verifying quantities and qualities of the product, and charge for such service, fees which are sufficient to make the service self-supporting.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58038.

The director may issue labels on request of the producer, packer, canner, or distributor, for any product for which labels have not otherwise been authorized by law, pursuant to such regulations as he deems necessary and charge for such labels such fees as in his judgment are proper.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58039.

The director may act on behalf of the consumers of any product in conserving and protecting their interests in every practicable way.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58040.

The director may improve, broaden, and extend in every practicable way, the distribution and sale of any product of this state throughout the markets of the world.

This section shall become operative January 1, 1990.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1480, Sec. 2.   Section operative January 1, 1990, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

58041.

The director may promote in the interest of the producer, the distributor, and consumer, economical and efficient distribution and marketing of any product which is produced or processed within the state and to better effectuate the purposes of this article may attend necessary meetings and conferences in relation to any such product and may enter into cooperative agreements with the United States Department of Agriculture.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58042.

The director may enter into any cooperative agreement with any department or agency of the federal government, or with any other state or agency of it, in order to effectuate the purposes of this division, Division 20 (commecing with Section 54001), or of any marketing law, including any marketing order, marketing program, regulation, or rule and regulation, which is issued under it, the responsibility for the administration and enforcement of which is with the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Investigations [58061. - 58062.]

58061.

The director may conduct investigations, make surveys, and assemble facts which are pertinent to marketing and to the formulation, administration, or amendment of any marketing order, agreement, or program which is authorized by any law now in effect or which may hereafter be enacted.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58062.

The director may make pertinent investigations which concern the aggregate amount of any product which is held in common or cold storage. In connection with any such investigation, the director may inspect only the pertinent books and records of common or cold storage warehouses for the purpose of determining and publishing aggregate amounts of any product which is held in storage, and may issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of pertinent books, papers, accounts, documents, and testimony in any such investigation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Collection and Dissemination of Information [58091. - 58093.]

58091.

The director shall provide for the collection, analysis, and dissemination of statistics and other information which relates to the production and marketing of farm products, including processed farm products, which are produced in this state, such as, but not limited to, crop and livestock estimating and market news services.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58092.

The director may establish such facilities and publish such bulletins and reports as are necessary and proper in keeping producers and handlers informed with regard to the supply, demand, and other economic conditions which affect the sale of any farm product which is produced in this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58093.

The director shall cooperate with the Secretary of Agriculture, and with the appropriate office of the State of Oregon, to establish a market news service in the Klamath Basin.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Cooperative Agreements [58201. - 58233.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [58201. - 58203.]

58201.

It is the policy of this state to gain maximum benefits in behalf of agriculture from the results of research and service work performed by local, state, and federal governments through coordination and correlation of such activities.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58202.

Since the Congress of the United States has recognized the value of marketing research, developmental, and service work through the enactment of agricultural marketing laws, including Public Law 733 (60 Stat. 966), and since Title II thereof embodies features of a nature akin to agricultural and regulatory service functions performed by the department, and inasmuch as financial cooperation in those phases of the marketing field is provided in Title II, it is hereby declared to be the purpose of this chapter to make possible a furtherance of intergovernmental cooperation in such marketing activities as will accrue advantageously to the agricultural industry of the state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58203.

The department is the proper state agency for such intergovernmental cooperation in those regulatory and service features contemplated by Public Law 733 (60 Stat. 966) and in relation to such other federal laws as may relate to the same and comparable activities.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Powers of the Director [58231. - 58233.]

58231.

The secretary may enter into cooperative agreements with the Secretary of Agriculture of the United States Department of Agriculture or the Administrator, Agricultural Marketing Act of 1946 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 1621 et seq.), or both, to develop projects or programs that are designed to improve, expand, and correlate the work of both agencies in any of the following:

(a) Federal-state cooperative crop reporting.

(b) Federal-state cooperative market news services.

(c) Seed and crop improvement.

(d) Agricultural products certification.

(e) Marketing orders and programs.

(f) Milk and milk products stabilization.

(g) Market enforcement.

(h) Agricultural trade.

(i) Agricultural commodities, grades, and standards.

(j) Prepackaging of, and special containers for, shipment of any farm product.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 215, Sec. 4.   (AB 2721)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

58231.1.

If a cooperative agreement related to federal-state cooperative market news services, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 58231, is not in effect in the state, the secretary may define grape-pricing districts in the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 81.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

58232.

The director may also enter into agreements with federal administrative committees established by the Secretary of Agriculture of the United States pursuant to the provisions of the Agricultural Marketing Agreement Act of 1937 (50 Stat. 246), with advisory boards and program committees which are established by the director pursuant to Chapters 1 (commencing with Section 58601) and 2 (commencing with Section 59501), Part 2 of this division, with producers’ cooperative marketing associations and other producer or handler organizations to assist financially or otherwise in the development of such projects or programs and in putting the results of such projects or programs into operation within this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58233.

The director may receive and pay out money for the purposes which are mentioned in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Void Contracts and Restraint of Trade [58351. - 58383.]



  ARTICLE 1. Void Contracts [58351. - 58353.]

58351.

Any contract which is made for the purpose of injuring competitors and destroying competition under which the seller of any agricultural product agrees to pay or allow any brokerage charge, rebate, discount, or other credit, except an allowance for variation in quality, condition, or quantity, or any other form of compensation or credit by a seller to a buyer, or to an agent, employee, subsidiary, or affiliate of a buyer that buys to sell at retail and which is not paid, given, or allowed in like circumstances to all other buyers or to the agents, employees, subsidiaries or affiliates of other buyers, whether the same is paid or allowed directly or indirectly, is hereby declared to be against public policy and void.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58352.

Advertising allotments or discounts by a seller to a buyer for bona fide advertising expenditures, however, are not included within such transactions which are against public policy and void.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58353.

It is a misdemeanor for any person to take any part in any transaction which is declared by this article to be against public policy and void whether as seller, buyer, buyer’s agent, employee, or subsidiary.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Destruction of Foodstuffs in Restraint of Trade [58381. - 58383.]

58381.

It is unlawful for any person to destroy, in restraint of trade, any fowl, animal, vegetable, aquacultural product, or other stuff, product, or article which is customary food, or which is proper for food, for human beings, and is in fit sanitary condition to be used as such.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 810, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

58382.

A person that receives any agricultural product, for sale on commission or for sale or exchange for the benefit of any other person, shall not destroy, abandon, discard as refuse, or dump, such product, without a permit in writing from the commissioner, county health officer, director, State Director of Health Services, or from some other official now or hereafter authorized by law to issue permits for the destruction of such product. Such permits, together with a detailed statement of every product which is destroyed pursuant to the permit, shall be kept on file by the person to whom they are issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

58383.

A copy of each such permit together with a copy of each such detailed statement shall, on the day such permit is issued, be served personally by the consignee, upon the consignor of the destroyed product, or in lieu of such personal service, shall on such day be served by the consignee on the consignor by depositing it in the post office, inclosed in a sealed envelope, postage fully prepaid, addressed to the consignor of the destroyed product at the consignor’s address, if known, or if not known, then to the place where the shipment or consignment of such product originated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Assignment of Dues [58451. - 58454.]

58451.

If any grower or producer of any farm product within this state voluntarily executes and causes to be delivered to a dealer or processor of farm products, either as a clause in a sales contract or other instrument in writing, a notice of assignment of dues to a nonprofit agricultural commodity organization directly representing the specific product involved, by which the processor or dealer is directed to deduct a sum from the price to be paid for such product and to pay the same over to such association as dues for the grower or producer, the processor or dealer shall deduct from the price to be paid for any farm product being sold by any such grower or producer to any such processor or dealer, the amount authorized and pay it over to the organization as assignee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58452.

No provision which is inserted in any contract that is prepared by a dealer or processor which makes an assignment of the dues described in Section 58451 ineffective is valid.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58453.

An assignment of dues may not exceed 2 percent of the total value of the product which is delivered by the grower or producer to the dealer or processor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58454.

Payment need not be made under any assignment of dues pursuant to Section 58451 until the dealer or processor has available and under his control funds owing to the grower or producer that are sufficient in amount for making the payment of the dues involved. In the case of an annual product, such payment need not be made until the end of the product year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Donation of Food [58501. - 58509.]

58501.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Agricultural product” means any fowl, animal, vegetable, or other stuff, product, or article which is customary food, or which is proper for food for human beings.

(b) “Food bank” means a surplus food collection and distribution system operated and established to assist in bringing donated agricultural products to nonprofit charitable organizations and individuals for the purpose of reducing hunger and nutritional needs.

(c) “Nonprofit charitable organization” means any organization which was organized and is operating for charitable purposes and meets the requirements set forth in Section 214 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1453, Sec. 3.   Effective September 26, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

58502.

(a) A person or gleaner engaged in the business of processing, distributing, or selling an agricultural product may donate, free of charge, a product that is in a condition that it may be used as food for human consumption to a nonprofit charitable organization within the state. Food facilities may donate food directly to end recipients for consumption. The donation of nonperishable food that is fit for human consumption, but that has exceeded the labeled shelf life date recommended by the manufacturer is protected under the California Good Samaritan Food Donation Act. The donation of perishable food that is fit for human consumption, but that has exceeded the labeled shelf life date recommended by the manufacturer is protected under the California Good Samaritan Food Donation Act if the person that distributes the food to the end recipient makes a good faith evaluation that the food to be donated is wholesome.

(b) To assist in accomplishing the purposes of
 this section, the director may divert agricultural products to organizations operating pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 619, Sec. 4.   (AB 1219)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

58503.

To assist in accomplishing the purposes of Section 58502, the board of supervisors of any county may establish, and publicize the availability of, a surplus food collection and distribution system, consisting of an inventory of storage facilities and refrigeration equipment that are available in the county for such purposes and a 24-hour information and food collection center for receiving and transmitting information as to where agricultural products are available or what organization desires or needs donated agricultural products, and for collecting, receiving, handling, storing, and distributing donated agricultural products. Any nonprofit charitable organization regularly needing agricultural products in its operations may be listed with such center for the purpose of being notified whenever such products are available.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 977.)
-------------------------------------------

58503.1.

In order to qualify as a food bank, an organization shall meet all of the following minimum standards:

(a) It shall have access to storage facilities and refrigeration equipment for the purpose of collecting, receiving, handling, storing, and distributing donated agricultural products.

(b) It shall be incorporated as a nonprofit tax exempt organization and be eligible as a charitable organization under paragraph (3) of subsection (c) of Section 501 of Title 26 of the United States Code or shall be affiliated with such an organization.

(c) It shall maintain records for the proper control of inventory.

(d) It shall demonstrate the availability of adequate liability insurance to cover the activities conducted pursuant to this chapter.

(e) It shall show local support through funding sources, letters of endorsement, and a board of directors reflective of the community and population to be served.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 500, Sec. 46.   (AB 1059)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

58503.2.

To assist in accomplishing the purposes of this chapter and to maximize use of state surplus equipment, the Director of General Services may assist a food bank by locating and providing available state surplus buildings or equipment necessary for the operation of a food bank.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1453, Sec. 7.   Effective September 26, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

58503.3.

Nothing in this chapter restricts or limits the operation of any other nonprofit organizations which are engaged in the distribution of agricultural products to nonprofit charitable organizations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1453, Sec. 8.   Effective September 26, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

58503.4.

Programs operated in accordance with this chapter shall complement, and not in any way lessen, assistance to families and individuals pursuant to the Food Stamp Act of 1977 (Chapter 51 (commencing with Section 2011) of Title 7 of the United States Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 106, Sec. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

58504.

The board of supervisors may provide for the inspection of such products by the county health officer, upon request of the donee, prior to delivery by the donor to determine whether such products may be used as food for human beings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 977.)
-------------------------------------------

58505.

Except for any injury resulting from gross negligence or willful act, no county or agency of a county established pursuant to this chapter and no person who donates any agricultural product shall be liable for any injury, including, but not limited to, injury resulting from the ingesting of such agricultural product, as a result of any act, or the omission of any act, in connection with donating any product pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 977.)
-------------------------------------------

58507.

(a) Any nonprofit charitable organization, that receives any agricultural product pursuant to this chapter, shall not sell or offer to sell any such agricultural product nor move or transfer such product out of the state, provided that any product that does not comply with the requirements of Division 17 (commencing with Section 42501) which is received by a charitable organization situated in this state may be shipped out of the state by such organization in accordance with regulations of the director to assure compliance with the purposes of this chapter.

This subdivision does not apply to agricultural products which comply with all maturity, quality, size, standard pack, container and labeling requirements of Division 17 (commencing with Section 42501).

(b) No person and no employee of a public agency shall sell, offer for sale, use, or consume any agricultural product donated or distributed pursuant to this chapter, except the recipient of an agricultural product provided as charitable assistance by a nonprofit charitable organization who shall use or consume the agricultural product provided.

(c) Any violation of this section is punishable by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 977.)
-------------------------------------------

58508.

In operating an information and food collection center pursuant to this chapter, the board of supervisors shall provide for the screening of donees to assure that agricultural products which are distributed at public expense are not donated to organizations that are capable of purchasing them.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 977.)
-------------------------------------------

58509.

(a) The Secretary of Food and Agriculture shall consult with four food bank representatives, two from the northern portion of the state, all of whom have been active members of a nationwide network of food banks for a minimum of two years immediately prior to appointment, and two from the southern portion of the state, all of whom have been active members of a nationwide network of food banks for a minimum of two years immediately prior to appointment, and two food industry representatives, one wholesaler and one manufacturer, all of whom shall be selected by the Governor and referred to as the Food Bank Advisory Committee.

(b) Members of the
 committee who are not state employees shall be paid per diem for their actual expenses in attending committee meetings.

(c) The committee shall do all of the following:

(1) Advise the Department of Food and Agriculture in the establishment of new food banks.

(2) Advise in the adequate and efficient distribution of surplus food commodities to all areas of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 101.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Foreign Marketing [58551. - 58583.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [58551. - 58565.]

58551.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the N. Waters-Nielsen-Vuich-Berryhill Foreign Market Development Export Incentive Program for California Agriculture Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1480, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

58552.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that it is the policy of this state to actively encourage and promote the sale of agricultural products of California in foreign markets and to assist farmers, processors, distributors, and exporters in meeting world market needs.

(b) The Legislature further finds and declares, as being consistent with the Thurman Agricultural Policy Act (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 801) of Part 1 of Division 1), both of the following:

(1) The harvest from approximately one out of every four acres of California cropland is now sold in foreign markets, thus the state’s agricultural economy is dependent upon international trade.

(2) It is in the public’s best interest to assist California agriculture in market development for agricultural products, and to expand world trade in these products to maximize growth in the state’s economy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 614, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

58553.

The definitions in this article apply to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1189, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

58553.5.

“Advisory committee” means the State Board of Food and Agriculture.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 982, Sec. 3.   Effective September 27, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

58554.

“Agricultural commodities” means the products of California farms and ranches and items processed from these products, and includes forest products, aquacultural products, and fish and fish products produced in California and livestock fed in feedlots located in California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 810, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

58555.

“Constraint” means a condition in a particular country or region which needs to be addressed in order to develop, expand, or maintain agricultural commodity exports.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1189, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

58556.

“Cooperator” means a private or nonprofit agricultural marketing organization; a nonprofit trade association, whose members market agricultural commodities, which has demonstrated expertise in the promotion of agricultural commodities that will coordinate a foreign market development program for its members; a federal marketing order board for California produced agricultural commodities; or a state marketing order board or commission organized pursuant to this code operating in California which is actively engaged in the marketing of agricultural commodities and has entered into a project agreement with the department to contribute cash, goods, or services to a foreign market development program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 155, Sec. 1.   Effective July 10, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

58557.

“Marketing” means the advertising, sale, and distribution of agricultural commodities, including private brands and trade names, in foreign markets.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1189, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

58558.

“Marketing plan” means the primary annual document prepared by cooperators and approved by the director which defines activities and budgets addressing constraints and the marketing of agricultural commodities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1189, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

58559.

“Project agreement” means a contract between the department and a cooperator under which the cooperator agrees to conduct activities that both address constraints and encourage the development or maintenance of agricultural commodity export sales.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1189, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

58560.

“State funds” means the funds made available by the department under a project agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1189, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

58561.

“Third party cooperator” means a foreign government or private organization which has entered into an agreement with a cooperator to join in the marketing of agricultural commodities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1189, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

58562.

“Cooperator contributions” means contributions of money, personnel, materials, facilities, services, or supplies, expressed in terms of United States dollar value, that are furnished by the cooperator and any third party cooperator to help carry out the terms of a project agreement. Funds, services, or personnel provided by any state or federal agency, except funds from a state marketing order board, including those funds allocated to carry out commodity transportation offset programs, agricultural commission organized pursuant to this code, or a federal marketing order board for California-produc ed commodities, cannot be counted as a contribution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 100, Sec. 2.   Effective May 18, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

58563.

The department shall adopt regulations, including criteria to establish what constitutes cooperator contributions, necessary to effectuate this chapter. Whenever applicable, the regulations shall be consistent with similar regulations adopted by the Foreign Agriculture Service of the United States Department of Agriculture.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1189, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

58564.

The department shall, as one of its functions, provide assistance to persons from foreign countries who desire to purchase agricultural products produced in this state. That assistance shall include advice on establishing business contacts that will meet the needs of the prospective purchaser.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 614, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

58565.

The department shall direct a portion of any additional funding, in excess of the original appropriation for purposes of this act, to be used for all of the following purposes:

(a) To conduct agricultural market research, including trends in California agricultural industry and trends in foreign agricultural markets. The agricultural market research shall be utilized to determine viable opportunities to export California agricultural products successfully to foreign markets.

(b) To conduct personnel training, including the training of California foreign trade office personnel.

(c) To perform existing duties of the department under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 574, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Project Agreements [58571. - 58580.]

58571.

(a) Project agreements may be entered into between the department and cooperators in order to address constraints and encourage the marketing of agricultural commodities in foreign countries. A project agreement may be limited to activities in one country, or may include activities in several countries. Project agreements shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) A description of the commodity, or commodities, for which a project agreement is being requested and a statement that California export availabilities are expected to be adequate during the life of the project.

(2) A description of the applicant organization or firm.

(3) A justification for participation in the foreign market development program.

(4) A statement of proposed activities, including specific information on the activities to be conducted, the countries in which they will be undertaken, who will conduct or supervise them, and the expected results.

(5) An estimate of the level of project funds required and an indication of the availability of industry resources to match project funds and personnel needed to carry out the proposed program.

(b) Cooperator activities shall be described and budgeted in a marketing plan which becomes part of the project agreement. The marketing plan shall be separately submitted to the director who may approve or disapprove it. The marketing plan shall be reviewed annually at which time it may be revised by the cooperator or the department, or by both.

(c) The marketing plan shall include all of the following:

(1) The proposed expenditure of state funds and cooperator contributions.

(2) Information on how much funding has been received from the Foreign Agriculture Service in the last five years and if those funds have been requested for the current year.

(3) An identification of the constraints to expanding or maintaining California exports to each market area addressed by the plan.

(4) A description of the proposed activities and the amount of funds, both state and cooperator, to be spent to overcome or mitigate the constraints for the commodity, or commodities, and the country, or countries, covered by the plan.

(5) A report, if available, from local attachés or the counselors regarding potential marketing activities in their countries.

(d) A project agreement may not go into effect pursuant to this chapter without the director’s approval of both the marketing plan and the agreement itself. 

(e) The cooperator shall administer and carry out the project agreement and shall permit the director or other state agencies to oversee and periodically inspect and investigate the administration of the project agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1189, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

58572.
